Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-108 Unlawful use of motor vehicle
insurance identification card. It shall be a violation of this article:

(1) For any person to make, issue, or knowingly use
any fictitious or fraudulently altered motor vehicle insurance identification
card; or

(2) For any person to display or cause or permit to
be displayed a motor vehicle insurance identification card knowing that the
motor vehicle insurance policy was canceled as provided in section 431:10C-111
and section 431:10C-112. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1997, c 251, §19]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next